Massachusetts, session 194th, H3833.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 33 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting, after section 139, the following section:-
Section 140. There shall be a permanent museum for the Massachusetts National
Guard located in the City of Salem as the federal birthplace of the National Guard. Furthermore,
it shall be recognized as the official military museum for the commonwealth of Massachusetts.
of 1